Nevada, session 83, SB447.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 1 and 1.5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 2. Chapter 338 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A party found by a court of competent jurisdiction to have
legal standing may bring an action against a public body in
district court to obtain an alternate writ of mandamus requiring
the public body to award a contract pursuant to the applicable
provisions of this chapter if:
(a) The public body attempts to award a contract in
compliance with chapter 332 or 333 of NRS, as described in
subsection 1 of NRS 338.011; and
(b) The work to be performed pursuant to the contract is not
directly related to the normal operation of the public body or the
normal maintenance of its property.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
2. The district court may award reasonable attorney’s fees
and costs to the prevailing party in an action filed pursuant to
subsection 1.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)